Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 3 Division of Arkansas Heritage
25-4-104. Division of Information Systems.

There is established within the Department of Transformation and Shared Services the Division of Information Systems.

The Division of Information Systems shall be headed by a director to be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate in the manner provided by law, and shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

The Director of the Division of Information Systems shall be a person who, by education and training, has technical knowledge and management experience in information technology-related equipment, systems, and services.

The Director of the Division of Information Systems shall qualify by filing the oath of office required in the Arkansas Constitution with the Secretary of State.

The Director of the Division of Information Systems, in consultation with the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services, may establish divisions and the organizational structure deemed necessary and appropriate for the efficient performance of the duties imposed under the provisions of this chapter, provided the organizational structure of the division shall conform to the positions authorized and limitations provided therefor in the biennial appropriation of the division.

The Director of the Division of Information Systems, in consultation with the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services, shall appoint the deputy and division directors and the professional, technical, and clerical assistants and employees as necessary to perform the duties imposed by this chapter. All employees of the division shall be employed by the department and serve at the pleasure of the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services.

The director shall report to the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services any matters relating to abuses of this chapter.

The Director of the Division of Information Systems shall recommend statutory changes to the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Information Systems” for “Department of Information Systems” in the section heading; rewrote (a); substituted “division” for “department” in (b)(1); substituted “Director of the Division of Information Systems” for “director” in (b)(2); in (c), inserted “in consultation with the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services” and substituted “division” for “department” twice; in (d), inserted “in consultation with the secretary” in the first sentence and, in the second sentence, substituted the first instance of “division” for “department”, inserted “the department”, and substituted “secretary” for “director”;and substituted “secretary” for “Governor” in (e) and (f).

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2013, No. 1201, § 11, provided: “GIFTS, GRANTS AND DONATIONS. The Director may accept on behalf of the Department of Information Systems, from any source, the donation of gifts, grants, cash, bequeaths, devices, donations, real or personal property and equipment for the establishment, maintenance, operations, or improvement of broadband services, enhancements and grants.”

Acts 2013, No. 1443, § 75, provided: “INNOVATION AND PROJECT DEVELOPMENT FUND TRANSFERS. The Department of Information Systems is a cost recovery agency subject to the requirements of the United States Office of Management and Budget Circular A-87 Cost Principles for State, Local and Indian Tribal Government (A-87) and Cost Principles for Developing Cost Allocation Plans and Indirect Cost Rates for Agreements with the Federal Government Implementation Guide for the Office of Management and Budget Circular A-87 (ASMBC-10). To comply with these federal rules, it is necessary to establish an Innovation and Project Development appropriation and general revenue fund account within the Department of Finance and Administration Disbursing Officer for the Department of Information Systems. This fund shall be used for state enterprise innovation projects that would enhance the technology operations of the State that cannot be cost allocated to federal programs. The Department of Information Systems will maintain documentation for projects billed for these purposes. Fund transfers may be made from the General Revenue Fund Account, upon the approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and prior review of the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee, to reimburse the Department of Information Systems for the amounts billed.”

Acts 2014, No. 217, § 11, provided: “GIFTS, GRANTS AND DONATIONS. The Director may accept on behalf of the Department of Information Systems, from any source, the donation of gifts, grants, cash, bequeaths, devices, donations, real or personal property and equipment for the establishment, maintenance, operations, or improvement of broadband services, enhancements and grants.”

Acts 2014, No. 285, § 78, provided: “INNOVATION AND PROJECT DEVELOPMENT FUND TRANSFERS. The Department of Information Systems is a cost recovery agency subject to the requirements of the United States Office of Management and Budget Circular A-87 Cost Principles for State, Local and Indian Tribal Government (A-87) and Cost Principles for Developing Cost Allocation Plans and Indirect Cost Rates for Agreements with the Federal Government Implementation Guide for the Office of Management and Budget Circular A-87 (ASMBC-10). To comply with these federal rules, it is necessary to establish an Innovation and Project Development appropriation and general revenue fund account within the Department of Finance and Administration Disbursing Officer for the Department of Information Systems. This fund shall be used for state enterprise innovation projects that would enhance the technology operations of the State that cannot be cost allocated to federal programs. The Department of Information Systems will maintain documentation for projects billed for these purposes. Fund transfers may be made from the General Revenue Fund Account, upon the approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and prior review of the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee, to reimburse the Department of Information Systems for the amounts billed.”

Acts 2015, No. 715, § 10, provided: “COMPLIANCE WITH STATE AND FEDERAL REGULATIONS.

“1.In order to effect compliance with the requirements of state and federal statutory and regulatory provisions, the Director shall adjust billing rates or issue billing adjustments to be federally compliant, notwithstanding the provisions of ACA §25-4-105 and §25-4-119 or funds sufficient to effect compliance shall be provided the Department from General Revenues, Special Revenues or such other fund sources as may become available. These actions shall be subject to the approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and approval by the Arkansas Legislative Council.

“2.The Director shall have authority to transfer funds between the Information Technology Reserve Fund established by ACA §25-4-123 and the Department of Information Systems Revolving Fund established by ACA §25-4-121 for cash management purposes.

“Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of appropriation and general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year is the prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually accomplished by delineating such maximums in the appropriation act(s) for a state agency and the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by amendment to the Revenue Stabilization law. Further, the General Assembly has determined that the Department of Information Systems may operate more efficiently if some flexibility is provided to the Department of Information Systems authorizing broad powers under this Section. Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee as provided by this section. The requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this section. If the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is void.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2015 through June 30, 2016.”

Acts 2015, No. 715, § 11, provided: “GIFTS, GRANTS AND DONATIONS.

The Director may accept on behalf of the Department of Information Systems, from any source, funds including but not limited to special or general revenue, gifts, grants, cash, bequeaths, devices, donations, real or personal property and equipment.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2015 through June 30, 2016.”

Acts 2015, No. 1070, § 76, provided:

“INNOVATION AND PROJECT DEVELOPMENT FUND TRANSFERS. The Department of Information Systems is a cost recovery agency subject to the requirements of the United States Office of Management and Budget Circular A-87 Cost Principles for State, Local and Indian Tribal Government (A-87) and Cost Principles for Developing Cost Allocation Plans and Indirect Cost Rates for Agreements with the Federal Government Implementation Guide for the Office of Management and Budget Circular A-87 (ASMBC-10). To comply with these federal rules, it is necessary to establish an Innovation and Project Development appropriation and general revenue fund account within the Department of Finance and Administration Disbursing Officer for the Department of Information Systems. This fund shall be used for state enterprise innovation projects that would enhance the technology operations of the State that cannot be cost allocated to federal programs. The Department of Information Systems will maintain documentation for projects billed for these purposes. Fund transfers may be made from the General Revenue Fund Account, upon the approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and prior review of the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee, to reimburse the Department of Information Systems for the amounts billed.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2015 through June 30, 2016.”

Acts 2016, No. 247, § 10, provided: “COMPLIANCE WITH STATE AND FEDERAL REGULATIONS.

“1.In order to effect compliance with the requirements of state and federal statutory and regulatory provisions, the Director shall adjust billing rates or issue billing adjustments to be federally compliant, notwithstanding the provisions of ACA §25-4-105 and §25-4-119 or funds sufficient to effect compliance shall be provided the Department from General Revenues, Special Revenues or such other fund sources as may become available. These actions shall be subject to the approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and approval by the Arkansas Legislative Council.

“2.The Director shall have authority to transfer funds between the Information Technology Reserve Fund established by ACA §25-4-123 and the Department of Information Systems Revolving Fund established by ACA §25-4-121 for cash management purposes.

“Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of appropriation and general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year is the prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually accomplished by delineating such maximums in the appropriation act(s) for a state agency and the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by amendment to the Revenue Stabilization law. Further, the General Assembly has determined that the Department of Information Systems may operate more efficiently if some flexibility is provided to the Department of Information Systems authorizing broad powers under this Section. Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee as provided by this section. The requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this section. If the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is void.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017.”

Acts 2016, No. 247, § 11, provided: “GIFTS, GRANTS AND DONATIONS. The Director may accept on behalf of the Department of Information Systems, from any source, funds including but not limited to special or general revenue, gifts, grants, cash, bequeaths, devices, donations, real or personal property and equipment.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017.”

Acts 2016, No. 251, § 76, provided: “INNOVATION AND PROJECT DEVELOPMENT FUND TRANSFERS. The Department of Information Systems is a cost recovery agency subject to the requirements of the United States Office of Management and Budget Circular A-87 Cost Principles for State, Local and Indian Tribal Government (A-87) and Cost Principles for Developing Cost Allocation Plans and Indirect Cost Rates for Agreements with the Federal Government Implementation Guide for the Office of Management and Budget Circular A-87 (ASMBC-10). To comply with these federal rules, it is necessary to establish an Innovation and Project Development appropriation and general revenue fund account within the Department of Finance and Administration Disbursing Officer for the Department of Information Systems. This fund shall be used for state enterprise innovation projects that would enhance the technology operations of the State that cannot be cost allocated to federal programs. The Department of Information Systems will maintain documentation for projects billed for these purposes. Fund transfers may be made from the General Revenue Fund Account, upon the approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and prior review of the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee, to reimburse the Department of Information Systems for the amounts billed.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017.”

Acts 2017, No. 900, § 9, provided: “COMPLIANCE WITH STATE AND FEDERAL REGULATIONS.

“1.In order to effect compliance with the requirements of state and federal statutory and regulatory provisions, the Director shall adjust billing rates or issue billing adjustments to be federally compliant, notwithstanding the provisions of ACA §25-4-105 and §25-4-119 or funds sufficient to effect compliance shall be provided the Department from General Revenues, Special Revenues or such other fund sources as may become available. These actions shall be subject to the approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and approval by the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee.

“2.The Director shall have authority to transfer funds between the Information Technology Reserve Fund established by ACA §25-4-123 and the Department of Information Systems Revolving Fund established by ACA §25-4-121 for cash management purposes.

“Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of appropriation and general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year is the prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually accomplished by delineating such maximums in the appropriation act(s) for a state agency and the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by amendment to the Revenue Stabilization law. Further, the General Assembly has determined that the Department of Information Systems may operate more efficiently if some flexibility is provided to the Department of Information Systems authorizing broad powers under this Section. Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee as provided by this section. The requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this section. If the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is void.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2017 through June 30, 2018.”

Acts 2017, No. 900, § 10, provided: “GIFTS, GRANTS AND DONATIONS. (i) The Director may accept on behalf of the Department of Information Systems, from any source, funds including but not limited to special or general revenue, gifts, grants, cash, bequeaths, devices, donations, real or personal property and equipment. (ii) The Department shall quarterly file with the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee a report summarizing all funds, gifts, grants, cash, bequeaths, devices, donations, real or personal property and equipment received. (iii) The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2017 through June 30, 2018.”

Amendments. The 2009 amendment subdivided the introductory language of (a); inserted “and other quasi-governmental entities” in (a)(2)(B); deleted “two-year” preceding “period” in (a)(2)(B)(i); deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a)(2)(G); substituted “Providing a State Cyber Security Office to monitor” for “Monitoring” in (a)(2)(K); rewrote (a)(2)(O); deleted “as requested by a state agency” following “contracts” in (a)(2)(P); substituted “Developing” for “Assisting in the development of” in (a)(2)(R); inserted (a)(2)(S) through (a)(2)(V); and made related and minor stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a)(1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910, in (a)(1), substituted “Division of Information Systems” for “Department of Information Systems” and “division” for “department” twice; substituted “division’s” for “department’s” in the introductory language in (a)(2); substituted “division” for “department” in (a)(2)(E)(ii) and (a)(2)(G); substituted “division plan” for “departmental plan” in (a)(2)(H); and substituted “Division of Information Systems” for “Department of Information Systems” in (a)(2)(Q).

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2001, No. 1042, § 8, provided:

“The current Department of Information Systems Steering Committee and the Department of Information Systems Advisory Board are hereby abolished.”

Acts 2014, No. 217, § 9, provided: “REPORTING REQUIREMENTS.

“(a)(1)The Director of the Department of Information Systems will report periodically to the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology and the Executive Chief Information Officer regarding the status of the Department of Information Systems' information technology responsibilities in state government.

“(2)The director will forward to the joint committee any statutory changes that the department may recommend sufficiently in advance of the convening of the session of the General Assembly.

“(3)The director may report any factors that are outside the scope of the department but are deemed to inhibit or to promote the department's responsibilities.

“(b)(1)By October 31, January 31, April 30, and July 31 of each fiscal year, the Director of the Department Information Systems shall compile and submit a report to:

“(A)The Arkansas Legislative Council, if submitted between regular sessions of the General Assembly;

“(B)The Joint Budget Committee, if submitted during a session of the General Assembly; and

“(C)The Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology.

“(2)The report shall:

“(A)Detail all requests from state agencies, boards, and commissions for advice regarding information technology planning, implementation, installation, rates or fees, utilization of products, services, and integrations or upgrades to be added to all existing technology plans; and

“(B)Provide a full report of all corresponding recommendations made by the Department of Information Systems to the requesting state agencies, boards, and commissions.

“(3)The report shall include:

“(A)The name of the state agency, board, or commission requesting the advice;

“(B)The name and scope of the project for which advice is being sought;

“(C)The type of advice sought, for example: technical, product or service utilization, planning, implementation, installation, integration, or upgrades;

“(D)A detailed explanation of all recommendations provided by the Department of Information Systems;

“(E)How the recommendation fits into the information technology plan of the agency, board, or commission;

“(F)How the recommendation fits into the state's information technology plan and shared technical architecture; and

“(G)Other information as may be useful for policy making decisions by the Legislative Council or Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology.”

Acts 2015, No. 715, § 9, provided: “REPORTING REQUIREMENTS.

“(a)(1)The Director of the Department of Information Systems will report periodically to the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology and the Executive Chief Information Officer regarding the status of the Department of Information Systems' information technology responsibilities in state government.

“(2)The director will forward to the joint committee any statutory changes that the department may recommend sufficiently in advance of the convening of the session of the General Assembly.

“(3)The director may report any factors that are outside the scope of the department but are deemed to inhibit or to promote the department's responsibilities.

“(b)(1)By October 31, January 31, April 30, and July 31 of each fiscal year, the Director of the Department Information Systems shall compile and submit a report to:

“(A)The Arkansas Legislative Council, if submitted between regular sessions of the General Assembly;

“(B)The Joint Budget Committee, if submitted during a session of the General Assembly; and

“(C)The Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology.

“(2)The report shall:

“(A)Detail all requests from state agencies, boards, and commissions for advice regarding information technology planning, implementation, installation, rates or fees, utilization of products, services, and integrations or upgrades to be added to all existing technology plans; and

“(B)Provide a full report of all corresponding recommendations made by the Department of Information Systems to the requesting state agencies, boards, and commissions.

“(3)The report shall include:

“(A)The name of the state agency, board, or commission requesting the advice;

“(B)The name and scope of the project for which advice is being sought;

“(C)The type of advice sought, for example: technical, product or service utilization, planning, implementation, installation, integration, or upgrades;

“(D)A detailed explanation of all recommendations provided by the Department of Information Systems;

“(E)How the recommendation fits into the information technology plan of the agency, board, or commission;

“(F)How the recommendation fits into the state's information technology plan and shared technical architecture; and

“(G)Other information as may be useful for policy making decisions by the Legislative Council or Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2015 through June 30, 2016.”

Acts 2016, No. 247, § 9, provided: “REPORTING REQUIREMENTS.

“(a)(1)The Director of the Department of Information Systems will report periodically to the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology and the Executive Chief Information Officer regarding the status of the Department of Information Systems' information technology responsibilities in state government.

“(2)The director will forward to the joint committee any statutory changes that the department may recommend sufficiently in advance of the convening of the session of the General Assembly.

“(3)The director may report any factors that are outside the scope of the department but are deemed to inhibit or to promote the department's responsibilities.

“(b)(1)By October 31, January 31, April 30, and July 31 of each fiscal year, the Director of the Department Information Systems shall compile and submit a report to:

“(A)The Arkansas Legislative Council, if submitted between regular sessions of the General Assembly;

“(B)The Joint Budget Committee, if submitted during a session of the General Assembly; and

“(C)The Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology.

“(2)The report shall:

“(A)Detail all requests from state agencies, boards, and commissions for advice regarding information technology planning, implementation, installation, rates or fees, utilization of products, services, and integrations or upgrades to be added to all existing technology plans; and

“(B)Provide a full report of all corresponding recommendations made by the Department of Information Systems to the requesting state agencies, boards, and commissions.

“(3)The report shall include:

“(A)The name of the state agency, board, or commission requesting the advice;

“(B)The name and scope of the project for which advice is being sought;

“(C)The type of advice sought, for example: technical, product or service utilization, planning, implementation, installation, integration, or upgrades;

“(D)A detailed explanation of all recommendations provided by the Department of Information Systems;

“(E)How the recommendation fits into the information technology plan of the agency, board, or commission;

“(F)How the recommendation fits into the state's information technology plan and shared technical architecture; and

“(G)Other information as may be useful for policy making decisions by the Legislative Council or Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017.”

Acts 2017, No. 900, § 8, provided: “REPORTING REQUIREMENTS.

“(a)(1)The Director of the Department of Information Systems will report periodically to the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology and the Executive Chief Information Officer regarding the status of the Department of Information Systems' information technology responsibilities in state government.

“(2)The director will forward to the joint committee any statutory changes that the department may recommend sufficiently in advance of the convening of the session of the General Assembly.

“(3)The director may report any factors that are outside the scope of the department but are deemed to inhibit or to promote the department's responsibilities.

“(b)(1)By October 31, January 31, April 30, and July 31 of each fiscal year, the Director of the Department Information Systems shall compile and submit a report to:

“(A)The Arkansas Legislative Council, if submitted between regular sessions of the General Assembly;

“(B)The Joint Budget Committee, if submitted during a session of the General Assembly; and

“(C)The Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology.

“(2)The report shall:

“(A)Detail all requests from state agencies, boards, and commissions for advice regarding information technology planning, implementation, installation, rates or fees, utilization of products, services, and integrations or upgrades to be added to all existing technology plans; and

“(B)Provide a full report of all corresponding recommendations made by the Department of Information Systems to the requesting state agencies, boards, and commissions.

“(3)The report shall include:

“(A)The name of the state agency, board, or commission requesting the advice;

“(B)The name and scope of the project for which advice is being sought;

“(C)The type of advice sought, for example: technical, product or service utilization, planning, implementation, installation, integration, or upgrades;

“(D)A detailed explanation of all recommendations provided by the Department of Information Systems;

“(E)How the recommendation fits into the information technology plan of the agency, board, or commission;

“(F)How the recommendation fits into the state's information technology plan and shared technical architecture; and

“(G)Other information as may be useful for policy making decisions by the Legislative Council or Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2017 through June 30, 2018.”

Amendments. The 2009 amendment deleted (a)(2) and redesignated the subsequent subdivision accordingly; and substituted “state enterprise” for “shared technical” in (b)(3)(F).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Information Systems” for “Department of Information Systems” twice in (a)(1); in (a)(2), substituted “division” for “department” and substituted “division’s responsibilities” for “department’s responsibilities”; and substituted “division” for “department” in (b)(2)(B).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning Department of Finance and Administration general powers and duties, was repealed by Acts 2009, No. 648, § 5. The section was derived from Acts 1977, No. 884, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1408; Acts 1997, No. 914, § 7; 2005, No. 1999, § 4; 2007, No. 751, § 15.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Information Systems” for “Department of Information Systems” in (a).

Agencies shall use project management for designated activities defined as a project.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Information Systems” for “Department of Information Systems” in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b), (e), and (f).

A statement of the agency's mission, goals, and objectives for information technology;

Goals and objectives for achieving electronic access to agency records, information, and services;

Consideration of a variety of information technologies, including those that help transcend geographic locations, standard business hours, economic conditions of users, and disabilities;

Compliance with the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.;

An explanation of how the state agency's mission, goals, and objectives for information technology support and conform to the state information technology plan developed by the division;

An implementation strategy to include:

Annual implementation objectives of the plan;

Methods to educate both state employees and the public in the effective use of access technologies; and

Agency activities to increase electronic access to public records and information to be implemented within available resources and existing state agency planning processes;

Projects and resources required to meet the objectives of the plan;

Estimated schedules and funding required to implement identified projects;

An evaluation of the agency's performance relating to information technology;

An assessment of progress made toward implementing the agency information technology plan;

A discussion of progress toward electronic access to public information and enabling citizens to have two-way interaction for obtaining information and services from state agencies; and

An inventory of state agency information technology.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment deleted (a)(1) and (b), subdivided (d) and (e), and redesignated accordingly; substituted “status reports annually or when requested” for “monthly status reports” in (a); substituted “Information Systems” for “Finance and Administration” in the introductory language of (c) and in (d)(1) and (e)(2); and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Information Systems” for “Department of Information Systems” in (a), the introductory language of (c), and (d)(1); and substituted “division” for “department” in (d)(2).

Authorize the agency to acquire the requested information technology in accordance with the state enterprise architecture;

Authorize acquisition of a modified information technology configuration;

Notify the agency of the availability of Division of Information Systems facilities to provide the requested information technology; or

Recommend that the information technology be provided through the facilities of some other designated state agency.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment substituted “Information Systems” for “Finance and Administration” throughout the section; inserted “in accordance with the state enterprise architecture” in (c)(4)(A); and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Information Systems” for “Department of Information Systems” in the introductory language of (b) and in (c)(4)(C); substituted “director” for “Director of the Department of Information Systems” throughout (c)(1)-(4); and inserted “and the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services” in (c)(2).

All state agencies shall comply with the provisions of the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 et seq., and applicable provisions of the General Accounting and Budgetary Procedures Law, § 19-4-101 et seq., in the acquisition, purchase, contracting for the purchase of, and leasing of information technology.

(1)In the case of state-supported institutions of higher education and state-supported postsecondary vocational-technical schools, the provisions of this chapter shall apply to business and administrative applications of information technology but do not apply to academic and research applications.

(1)A state-supported institution of higher education, a post-secondary vocational-technical school, an area vocational school, or a public school district may request technical assistance regarding information technology from the Division of Information Systems.

However, the requesting institution shall reimburse the division for any actual expenses incurred while providing requested technical assistance.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Information Systems” for “Department of Information Systems” in (b)(1); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b)(2)(A) and (B).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning acquisition of information technology by constitutional officers, General Assembly, Supreme Court, or Administrative Office of the Courts, was repealed by Acts 2001, No. 1722, § 9. The section was derived from Acts 1977, No. 884, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1414; Acts 1997, No. 914, § 13.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment rewrote (a); inserted (b); and redesignated the subsequent subsection accordingly.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Information Systems” for “Director of the Department of Information Systems” in (b).

Contracts and agreements for state agencies for information technology shall adhere to the state enterprise architecture.

A state agency shall submit to the Director of the Division of Information Systems for review and approval a request for the state agency to enter into a technology contract or agreement that is not in compliance with the state enterprise architecture.

Contracts for the provision of information technology are interagency agreements and are exempt from the provisions of the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 et seq., and the General Accounting and Budgetary Procedures Law, § 19-4-101 et seq., nor are they required to be submitted to the Legislative Council for advice.

(1)In the event that, due to unforeseen circumstances, the Division of Information Systems cannot provide sufficient information technology support to state agencies, the Director of the Division of Information Systems is authorized to enter into professional services contracts for the necessary information technology support.

(1)The division may utilize moneys appropriated for maintenance, operation, and payment of regular salaries of the division for the purchase of professional services upon approval thereof by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

In addition, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall obtain the advice of the Legislative Council before approving any transfer of regular salary appropriations to the maintenance and operation appropriation of the agency to be used for payment of professional services.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “division” for “department” in the section heading and throughout (a)(2), (b)(1), and (b)(2)(A); and substituted “Division of Information Systems” for “Department of Information Systems” twice in (a)(1).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Information Systems” for “Department of Information Systems” in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in (a) and (b)(3).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “division” and “division’s” for “department” and “department’s” throughout the section; and substituted “Division of Information Systems” for “Department of Information Systems” in (a).

Cross References. Department of Information Systems Revolving Fund,§19-5-1055.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning appeals, was repealed by Acts 2001, No. 1722, § 13. The section was derived from Acts 1977, No. 884, § 13; 1979, No. 951, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1413; Acts 1997, No. 914, § 18.

Before a state agency may enter into an agreement with the Division of Information Systems for purchase of information technology, the agency shall certify that adequate appropriations and funds are available for purchasing information technology from the division.

(1)If the state agency's line item appropriation for purchase of information technology is inadequate and if there are contemplated savings in the funds appropriated for the requesting agency which could be utilized for purchase of information technology without jeopardizing other essential programs and services of the state agency, then the savings which may be required for the purchase of services may be transferred, upon written approval of the amount thereof by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, from any appropriation of the agency to the agency appropriation for the purchase of information technology on the books of the Auditor of State and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

For accounts that are thirty (30) days overdue and have no charges contested by the user, the Division of Information Systems may request the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State to transfer all or part of the overdue amount from the user's account to the division's revolving account. The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall transfer the amount within ten (10) working days.

For accounts that are sixty (60) days overdue and have charges being contested by the user, the division may request the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State to transfer all or part of the overdue amount from the user's account to the division's revolving account. If the resolution of contested charges favors the user, the user may request the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State to transfer all or part of the overdue amount from the division's revolving account to the user's account.

The division is authorized to discontinue information technology service to users who do not make a timely remittance of payment for services rendered and is specifically prohibited from providing services to state agencies lacking funds or sufficient appropriations to pay for the services.
